Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.535

Community or technical college—Issuance of high school diploma or certificate.

A community or technical college may issue a high school diploma or certificate as provided under this section.

(1) An individual who satisfactorily meets the requirements for high school completion shall be awarded a diploma from the college, subject to rules adopted by the superintendent of public instruction and the state board of education.

(2) An individual sixteen years or older or enrolled through the option established under RCW 28A.600.310 through 28A.600.400, who satisfactorily completes an associate degree through a community or technical college, including an associate of arts degree, associate of science degree, associate of technology degree, or associate in applied science degree, shall be awarded a diploma from the college upon written request from the student. Individuals under twenty-one years of age under this subsection are eligible for funding provided under chapter 28A.150 RCW.

[ 2019 c 269 s 1; 2017 c 93 s 1; 2009 c 524 s 2; 2007 c 355 s 2; 1991 c 238 s 58; 1969 ex.s. c 261 s 30.]

NOTES:

Intent—2009 c 524: "The legislature has previously affirmed the value of career and technical education, particularly in programs that lead to nationally recognized certification. These programs provide students with the knowledge and skills to become responsible citizens and contribute to their own economic well-being and that of their families and communities, which is the goal of education in the public schools. The legislature has also previously affirmed the value of dual enrollment in college and high school programs that can lead to both an associate degree and a high school diploma. Therefore, the legislature intends to maximize students' options and choices for completing high school by awarding diplomas to students who complete these valuable postsecondary programs." [ 2009 c 524 s 1.]

Finding—Intent—2007 c 355: "The legislature finds that the goal of Washington's education reform is for all students to meet rigorous academic standards so that they are prepared for success in college, work, and life. Educators know that not all students learn at the same rate or in the same way. Some students will take longer to meet the state's standards for high school graduation. Older students who cannot graduate with their peers need an appropriate learning environment and flexible programming that enables them simultaneously to earn a diploma, work, and pursue other training options. Providing learning options in locations in addition to high schools will encourage older students to complete their diplomas. Therefore the legislature intends to create a pilot high school completion program at two community and technical colleges for older students who have not yet received a diploma but are eligible for state basic education support." [ 2007 c 355 s 1.]

Severability—1969 ex.s. c 261: See note following RCW 28B.50.020.